Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska23-1736
Classified service; political activity; prohibited.

No person serving in the classified service under sections 23-1721 to 23-1736 shall actively participate in any campaign conducted by any candidate for public office while on duty or while in uniform.

Laws 1969, c. 140, § 16, p. 647;

Laws 2003, LB 222, § 12.